Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 14 Arkansas Time-Share Act
18-14-503. Prohibited advertising.

An advertisement for the offer or sale of time-shares shall not:

(1)

Contain a representation concerning the availability of a resale program or rental program offered by or on behalf of the developer or its affiliate unless the resale program or rental program has been made a part of the offering and submitted to the Arkansas Real Estate Commission;

(2)

Contain an offer or inducement to purchase that limits the quantity or time of availability, unless the numerical quantity or time applicable to the offer or inducement is clearly and conspicuously disclosed;

(3)

Contain a statement concerning the investment merit or profit potential of the time-share, unless the commission has determined that the representation is neither false nor misleading;

(4)

Make a prediction of or imply specific or immediate increases in the price or value of the time-share property, nor shall a price increase of a time-share property be promoted unless the developer has authorized and announced the price increase;

(5)

Contain statements concerning the availability of time-share interests at a particular minimum price if the number of time-share interests available at that price comprises less than ten percent (10%) of the unsold inventory of the developer, unless the number of time-share interests then for sale at the minimum price is stated in the advertisement;

(6)

Contain a statement that the time-share interest being offered for sale can be further divided, unless a full disclosure is included concerning the legal requirements for further division of the time-share interest;

(7)

Contain an asterisk or other reference symbol as a means of contradicting or changing the ordinary meaning of a previously made statement in the advertisement;

(8)

Misrepresent the size, nature, extent, qualities, or characteristics of the accommodations or facilities that comprise the time-share plan;

(9)

Misrepresent the nature or extent of a service incident to the time-share project;

(10)

Misrepresent or imply that a facility or service is available for the exclusive use of purchasers or owners if a public right of access or of use of the facility or service exists;

(11)

Make a misleading or deceptive representation concerning the contents of the time-share permit, the purchase contract, the purchaser's rights, privileges, benefits, or obligations under the purchase contract or this chapter;

(12)

Misrepresent the conditions under which a purchaser or owner may participate in an exchange program; or

(13)

Describe a proposed or unfinished private facility over which the developer has no control, unless the estimated date of completion is stated and evidence has been presented to the commission that the completion and operation of the facilities are reasonably assured within the time represented in the advertisement.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 6, § 6-103; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1336; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “commission” for “agency” and “time-share interests” for “time-shares” throughout the section; substituted “Arkansas Real Estate Commission” for “agency” in (1); rewrote (2); deleted “from evidence submitted on behalf of the developer” following “determined” in (3); in (4), substituted “time-share property” for “time-shares” and substituted “property be promoted unless the developer has authorized and announced the price increases” for “be announced more than sixty (60) days prior to the date that the increase will be placed into effect”; substituted “plan” for “project” in (8); substituted “unfinished” for “uncompleted” in (13); and made stylistic changes.

18-14-504. Unfair acts or practices.

(a)

It is unlawful for a person to offer by mail, telephone, electronic media, or in person a prize or gift, with the intent to offer a sales presentation for a time-share plan, without also disclosing in a clear and unequivocal way that there will be a sales presentation when making the offer of the prize or gift.

(b)

The following unfair acts or practices undertaken by, or omissions of, a person in the operation of a prize or gift promotional offer for a time-share plan are prohibited:

(1)

Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose the rules, terms, and conditions of the promotional program, a description of the prizes offered, if any, and the date that the prize or gift offer will terminate or expire;

(2)(A)

Failing to disclose the retail value of the gift or prize and the odds of winning.

(B)

The person making the offer shall maintain a sufficient inventory of the gift or prize to be able to equal the reasonable response to the offer;

(3)

Failing to obtain the express written or oral consent of individuals before their names are used for a promotional purpose with a mailing to a third person;

(4)(A)

Failing to award and distribute at least one (1) of each prize or gift of the value and type represented in the promotional program by the day and year specified in the promotion.

(B)

If a promotion promises the award of a prescribed number of each prize, this number of prizes shall be awarded by the date and year specified in the promotion; or

(5)

Misrepresenting in any way the odds of receiving a prize or gifts or the rules, terms, or conditions of participation in the promotional program.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 6, § 6-104; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1337; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a); substituted “plan” for “project” in (b); in (b)(1), deleted “regulations” following “rules” and substituted “that” for “on or before which”; redesignated (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(B); deleted “in connection” following “purpose” in (b)(3); redesignated (b)(4) as (b)(4)(A) and (b)(4)(B); substituted “any way” for “any manner” in (b)(5); and made stylistic changes.

18-14-505. Enforcement.

If the Arkansas Real Estate Commission determines that a person is violating or failing to comply with the requirements of this subchapter, the commission may order the person to cease and desist from the violations and may take enforcement action under §18-14-201 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 6, § 6-105; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1338; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

Subchapter 6

— Financing

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 294, § 6-106: Mar. 25, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is essential to the protection of the residents of this State that provision be made for the sale and regulation of Time-Share Intervals by the Real Estate Commission; that this Act is designed to provide for such regulation and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-14-601. Financing of time-share plans.

(a)

In the financing of a time-share plan, the developer and its successors in interest shall retain financial records of the schedule of payments required to be made and the payments made to a person or entity that is the lienholder of an underlying blanket mortgage, deed of trust, contract of sale, or other lien or encumbrance.

(b)

Any transfer of the developer's interest in the time-share plan to a third person is subject to the obligations of the developer to the extent the obligations were originally established in written documents recorded in the real estate records and not existing solely from the offering of materials or filings with a governmental authority.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 5, § 5-101; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1332; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “plans” for “programs” in the section heading; and “plan” for “program” throughout the section; designated the existing paragraph as (a) and (b); inserted “and its successors in interest” in (a); and added “to the extent the obligations were originally established in written documents recorded in the real estate records and not existing solely from the offering of materials or filings with a governmental authority” at the end of (b).

18-14-602. Protection of purchasers from subsequent underlying lien.

The developer whose project is subjected to an underlying blanket lien or encumbrance subsequent to the transfer of a time-share interest shall protect nondefaulting purchasers from foreclosure by:

(1)

Obtaining from the lienholder a nondisturbance clause, subordination agreement, or partial release of the lien for those time-share interests sold; or

(2)

Providing a surety bond or insurance against the lien from a company acceptable to the Arkansas Real Estate Commission.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 294, Art. 5, § 5-102; A.S.A. 1947, § 50-1333; Acts 2013, No. 710, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

Subchapter 7

— Camping Sites

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this chapter” in subchapters 1-6 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

18-14-701. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “time-share plan” shall have the same meaning as used in §18-14-102.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 619, § 1; 2013, No. 710, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “plan” for “program” and “used” for “provided”.

18-14-702. Camping site — Buyer's right to cancel.

(a)

In addition to any other right to revoke an offer, the buyer has the absolute right to cancel a contract or offer for the purchase of a camping site under a time-share plan until midnight of the fifth calendar day after the day that the buyer signs an agreement, excluding Sundays and the holidays under §1-5-101.

(b)

Cancellation occurs if the buyer returns to the seller the notice of cancellation provided by the seller.

(c)

The notice of cancellation may be sent by registered mail.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 619, § 2; 2013, No. 710, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added “Camping site” to the section heading; in (a), substituted “plan” for “program”, deleted “excluding Sundays and holidays as declared in §1-5-101” preceding “after the day”, and added “excluding Sundays and the holidays under §1-5-101”; substituted “provided by” for “the notice having been provided for the buyer” in (b); and rewrote (c).

18-14-703. Seller to provide notice of cancellation — Form.

(a)

The seller of a camping site under a time-share plan shall furnish to the buyer at the time the buyer signs the sales contract or otherwise agrees to buy the camping site a complete form in duplicate captioned “NOTICE OF CANCELLATION”, which is attached to the contract or receipt, is easily detachable, and contains in 10-point bold-face type, the following information and statements:

“NOTICE OF CANCELLATION
Enter date of transaction You are entitled to cancel the agreement or offer at any time before midnight of the fifth day, excluding Sundays and holidays, after the day you signed the agreement or offer. If you cancel, the seller must return to you (1) any payments made; (2) any goods or other property (or a sum equal to the amount of the trade-in allowance given therefore); and (3) any note or other evidence of indebtedness, given by you to the seller under or with the agreement or offer. TO CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION, MAIL OR DELIVER A SIGNED AND DATED COPY OF THIS CANCELLATION NOTICE OR ANY OTHER WRITTEN NOTICE TO
(Name of seller) (Address of seller's place of business) NOT LATER THAN MIDNIGHT OF
(Date) I HEREBY CANCEL THIS TRANSACTION
(Date) (Buyer's signature)”.

Click to view form.

(b)

If seller fails to give both oral and written notice of the buyer's right to cancellation, the cooling-off period does not begin to run until actual notice is given.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 619, § 3; 2013, No. 710, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment in the first paragraph of (a), substituted “plan shall” for “program must”, “camping site” for “campsite” and substituted “contains” for “which shall contain”; and in the second paragraph of (a), substituted “offer at any time before midnight” for “offer referred to above at any time prior to midnight”, “If” for “in the event”, and “under or” for “pursuant to or in connection”.